Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-111
Incumbent, defined.

Incumbent shall mean the person whom the canvassers or the courts declare elected to an elective office or who has been appointed to an elective office.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 11.